District of Columbia statutes.
42-3207

Refusal to surrender possession; double rent.

If the tenant, after having given notice of his intention to quit as aforesaid, shall refuse, without reasonable excuse, to surrender possession according to such notice, he shall be liable to the landlord for rent at double the rate of rent payable according to the terms of tenancy for all the time that the tenant shall so wrongfully hold over, to be recovered in the same way as the rent accruing before the termination of the tenancy.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1382, ch. 854, § 1224
1981 Ed., § 45-1407.
1973 Ed., § 45-907.